pt-PT: Business e industrial > Médico > Instrumentos médicos: Fórceps médicos; Lâminas de bisturi; Bisturis; Agulhas e suturas cirúrgicas
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 醫療業 > 醫療器材: 醫療用鉗子; 手術刀片; 手術刀; 手術縫合針/線
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Медицина > Медицинские инструменты: Медицинские зажимы и пинцеты; Лезвия для скальпелей; Скальпели; Хирургические иглы и шовные материалы
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Branża medyczna > Instrumenty medyczne: Kleszcze medyczne; Ostrza do skalpeli; Skalpele; Igły i nici chirurgiczne
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Sectorul medical > Instrumente medicale: Pensă medicală; Lame de bisturiu; Bisturie; Ace și suturi chirurgicale
es: Economía e industria > Productos médicos > Instrumentos médicos: Fórceps médicos; Cuchillas de bisturí; Bisturís; Suturas y agujas quirúrgicas
da: Erhverv og industri > Medicinsk > Medicinske instrumenter: Medicinske pincetter; Skalpelblade; Skalpeller; Operationsnåle og suturer
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Medicina > Instrumentos médicos: Fórceps; Lâminas de bisturi; Bisturis; Agulhas e suturas cirúrgicas
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Медицински > Медицински инструменти: Медицински форцепси; Остриета за скалпел; Скалпели; Хирургически игли и конци
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Medisch > Medische instrumenten: Medische tang; Scalpelbladen; Scalpels; Chirurgische naalden en hechtdraad
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Medikal > Tıbbi Aletler: Medikal Forsepsler; Neşter Bıçakları; Neşterler; Cerrahi İğneler ve İplikler
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 의료 > 의료 기구: 의료용 겸자; 메스날; 메스; 수술용 바늘/봉합사
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 医療 > 医療用器具: 鉗子; メス替刃; メス; 手術用縫合針、手術用縫合糸
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Orvosi > Orvosi műszerek: Orvosi csipeszek; Szikepengék; Szikék; Sebészeti tűk és varratok
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การแพทย์ > เครื่องมือทางการแพทย์: คีมของแพทย์; ใบมีดผ่าตัด; มีดผ่าตัด; เข็มและไหมเย็บแผล
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Medizinischer Bereich > Medizinische Instrumente: Medizinische Zangen; Skalpellklingen; Skalpelle; Chirurgische Nadeln und Fäden
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zdravotnictví > Lékařské nástroje: Lékařské kleště; Skalpelové čepelky; Skalpely; Chirurgické jehly a nitě
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Secteur médical > Instruments médicaux: Forceps; Lames de scalpels; Scalpels; Aiguilles chirurgicales et sutures
en: Business & Industrial > Medical > Medical Instruments: Medical Forceps; Scalpel Blades; Scalpels; Surgical Needles & Sutures
sv: Företag och industri > Sjukvård > Medicinska instrument: Medicinsk tång; Skalpellblad; Skalpeller; Sprutor och suturer vid kirurgi
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Lääketiede > Lääketieteelliset instrumentit: Lääketieteelliset pihdit; Skalpellien terät; Skalpellit; Kirurgiset neulat ja ompeleet
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medicina > Medicinos instrumentai: Medicininės žnyplės; Skalpelių peiliukai; Skalpeliai; Chirurginės adatos ir siūlai
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zdravotníctvo > Lekárske nástroje: Lekárske kliešte; Skalpelové čepele; Skalpely; Chirurgické ihly a nite
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 医疗 > 医疗仪器: 医用钳子; 手术刀片; 解剖刀; 手术针与缝合线
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Medicina > Medicinski instrumenti: Medicinske škare; Oštrice za skalpel; Skalpeli; Kirurške igle i konci
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Ιατρικά είδη > Ιατρικά όργανα: Ιατρικές λαβίδες; Λεπίδες νυστεριού; Νυστέρια; Χειρουργικές βελόνες & ράμματα
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zdravstvo > Medicinski instrumenti: Medicinske klešče; Rezila za skalpel; Skalpeli; Kirurške igle in niti
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Y tế > Dụng cụ y tế: Kẹp/nhíp y tế; Lưỡi dao phẫu thuật; Dao giải phẫu; Kim và chỉ khâu phẫu thuật
nb: Forretninger og industri > Medisinsk > Medisinske instrumenter: Medisinske tenger; Skalpellblader; Skalpeller; Kirurgiske nåler og suturer
it: Commercio e industria > Medicina > Strumenti medici: Forcipi medici; Lame per scalpelli; Scalpelli; Aghi e suture chirurgici